zh-TW: 大鼓皮內建弱音器: 減震環 (外部); 減震環 (內部); 泡棉/消音環; 內建毛氈條; 無; 注油/控音; 開孔/打洞減震系統; 其他
nl: Bassdrumvel ingebouwde demping: Dempring (extern); Dempring (intern); Schuim-/dempring; Geïntegreerde viltstrook; Geen; Oliegevuld/gecontroleerd geluid; Geventileerd/gepoort dempsysteem; Overig
zh-CN: 低音鼓鼓皮自带消音功能: 阻尼环（外部）; 阻尼环（内部）; 泡沫/消音环; 内置毡带; 无; 充油/控音; 开孔阻尼系统; 其他
hr-HR: Glava palice za bas-bubanj s ugrađenim prigušivačem: Prsten za prigušivanje zvuka (vanjski); Prsten za prigušivanje zvuka (unutarnji); Spužva / prsten za prigušivanje; Ugrađena traka od filca; Ništa; Punjeno uljem / kontrolirani zvuk; Sustav za prigušivanje s otvorima; Ostalo
pt-PT: Pele de bombo com abafador incorporado: Anel abafador (externo); Anel abafador (interno); Espuma/anel abafador; Faixa de feltro integrada; Nenhum; Com óleo/som controlado; Sistema de amortecimento ventilado/com porta; Outro
bg-BG: Вградено заглушаване на кожата на бас барабана: Демпферен пръстен (външен); Демпферен пръстен (вътрешен); Пръстен от пяна/заглушител; Вградена филцова лента; Няма; Маслен/контролиран звук; Вентилирана/отворена демпферна система; Друго
tr: Bas davul derisi entegre susturma tipi: Sönümleme halkası (dış); Sönümleme halkası (iç); Köpük/susturucu halka; Entegre keçe şerit; Yok; Yağ dolgulu/kontrollü ses; Hava delikli/portlu sönümleme sistemi; Diğer
fr: Peau de grosse caisse avec système d’atténuation intégré: Anneau atténuateur (externe); Anneau atténuateur (interne); Mousse/anneau atténuateur; Bande de feutre intégrée; Aucun; Rempli d’huile/son contrôlé; Système d’atténuation aéré/perforé; Autre
da: Indbygget dæmpning til stortrommeskind: Dæmperring (ekstern); Dæmperring (intern); Skum/dæmperring; Integreret filtstrimmel; Ingen; Oliebelagt/kontrolleret lyd; Ventileret dæmpningssystem; Andet
lt-LT: Integruotas bosinio būgno membranos slopinimas: Slopinimo žiedas (išorinis); Slopinimo žiedas (vidinis); Porolono / slopinimo žiedas; Integruota veltinio juostelė; Nėra; Su alyvos užpildu / kontroliuojamo garso; Slopinimo sistema su angomis; Kita
cs: Integrované tlumení blány velkého bubnu: Tlumicí kroužek (vnější); Tlumicí kroužek (vnitřní); Pěnový/tlumicí kroužek; Integrovaný plstěný proužek; Žádné; Plněná olejem / kontrolovaný zvuk; Tlumicí systém s otvory; Jiné
ro-RO: Amortizor încorporat pentru capul de tobă bas: Inel de amortizare (extern); Inel de amortizare (intern); Inel din spumă/de amortizare; Bandă din pâslă integrată; Fără; Umplut cu ulei/sunet controlat; Sistem de amortizare cu orificii/ventilare; Altele
sk-SK: Vstavané tlmenie blany basového bubna: Tlmiaci krúžok (vonkajší); Tlmiaci krúžok (vnútorný); Penový/tlmiaci krúžok; Integrovaný plstený pásik; Žiadne; Plnené olejom/kontrolovaný zvuk; Odvetrávaný tlmiaci systém; Iné
sv: Inbyggd dämpning för bastrumskinn: Dämpningsring (extern); Dämpningsring (intern); Skum-/dämpningsring; Inbyggd filtremsa; Ingen; Oljefylld/kontrollerat ljud; Ventilerat/portat dämpningssystem; Övrigt
es: Silenciador incorporado para el parche del bombo: Anillo amortiguador (externo); Anillo amortiguador (interno); Anillo de espuma/sordina; Tira de fieltro integrada; Ninguno; Lleno de aceite/sonido controlado; Sistema de amortiguación ventilado/con puerto; Otro
hu: Basszusdobfejbe beépített hangtompító: Tompítógyűrű (külső); Tompítógyűrű (belső); Szivacs/tompítógyűrű; Beépített filccsíkkal; Nincs; Olajtöltetű/kontrollált hangzású; Szellőzős/nyílásos tompítórendszer; Egyéb
fi: Bassorummun kalvoon sisäänrakennettu vaimennus: Vaimennusrengas (ulkoinen); Vaimennusrengas (sisäinen); Vaahtomuovi-/vaimennusrengas; Integroitu huopanauha; Ei mitään; Öljytäytteinen/kontrolloitu ääni; Tuuletettu/aukollinen vaimennusjärjestelmä; Muu
it: Pelle della grancassa con smorzamento incorporato: Anello smorzatore (esterno); Anello smorzatore (interno); Anello in schiuma/sordina; Striscia di feltro integrata; Nessuno; A olio/Sustain controllato; Sistema di smorzamento ventilato/con fori; Altro
en: Bass drum head built-in muffling: Damping ring (external); Damping ring (internal); Foam/muffle ring; Integrated felt strip; None; Oil-filled/controlled sound; Vented/ported damping system; Other
sl-SI: Vdelano dušenje glave bas bobna: Dušilni obroč (zunanji); Dušilni obroč (notranji); Penasti/dušilni obroč; Integriran trak iz filca; Brez; Polnjeno z oljem / nadzorovan zvok; Zračen/odprt dušilni sistem; Drugo
th: ระบบลดเสียงในตัวของหนังกลองเบส: วงแหวนซับเสียง (ด้านนอก); วงแหวนซับเสียง (ด้านใน); โฟม/วงแหวนซับเสียง; แถบสักหลาดในตัว; ไม่มี; บรรจุน้ำมัน/ควบคุมเสียง; ระบบซับเสียงแบบมีช่องระบายอากาศ/พอร์ต; อื่นๆ
de: Integrierte Dämpfung des Bassdrumfells: Dämpfungsring (außen); Dämpfungsring (innen); Schaumstoff-/Dämpfungsring; Integrierter Filzstreifen; Keine; Ölgefüllt/Controlled Sound; Belüftetes/geportetes Dämpfungssystem; Sonstige
nb: Innebygd demping for basstrommeskinn: Dempingsring (ekstern); Dempingsring (intern); Skum/dempingsring; Integrert filtstripe; Ingen; Oljefylt/kontrollert lyd; Ventilert/portet dempingssystem; Annet
ru: Встроенная система глушения мембраны бас-барабана: Демпфирующее кольцо (внешнее); Демпфирующее кольцо (внутреннее); Поролоновое / демпфирующее кольцо; Встроенная фетровая полоса; Нет; Маслонаполненный / контролируемый звук; Вентилируемая / портированная система демпфирования; Другое
el: Ενσωματωμένη σίγαση μεμβράνης μπάσου τυμπάνου: Δακτύλιος απόσβεσης (εξωτερικός); Δακτύλιος απόσβεσης (εσωτερικός); Αφρός / δακτύλιος σιγαστήρα; Ενσωματωμένη λωρίδα τσόχας; Κανένα; Γεμάτο με λάδι / ελεγχόμενου ήχου; Σύστημα απόσβεσης με οπές εξαερισμού; Άλλο
vi: Hệ thống giảm âm tích hợp trên mặt trống bass: Vòng giảm âm (bên ngoài); Vòng giảm âm (bên trong); Mút xốp/vòng tiêu âm; Dải nỉ tích hợp; Không có; Bơm dầu/kiểm soát âm thanh; Hệ thống giảm âm có lỗ thông hơi/có cổng; Khác
ja: バスドラムヘッド内蔵ミュート機能: ダンピングリング (外部); ダンピングリング (内部); フォーム/マッフルリング; フェルトストリップ内蔵; なし; オイル入り/コントロールドサウンド; ベント/ポート付きダンピングシステム; その他
pl: Wbudowane tłumienie membrany stopy perkusyjnej: Pierścień tłumiący (zewnętrzny); Pierścień tłumiący (wewnętrzny); Pianka / pierścień tłumiący; Zintegrowany pasek filcowy; Brak; Wypełnienie olejowe / kontrolowany dźwięk; System tłumienia z portami / wentylowany; Inne
pt-BR: Pele do bumbo com abafador embutido: Anel abafador (externo); Anel abafador (interno); Anel de espuma/abafador; Tira de feltro integrada; Nenhum; Com óleo/som controlado; Sistema de abafamento ventilado/com porta; Outros
ko: 베이스 드럼 헤드 내장형 소음 차단 기능: 댐핑 링(외부); 댐핑 링(내부); 폼/머플 링; 일체형 펠트 스트립; 없음; 오일 충전/컨트롤드 사운드; 벤티드/포티드 댐핑 시스템; 기타